Missouri, session 2026, SB1005.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 281.260, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 281.260,
to read as follows:
281.260. 1. Every pesticide which is distributed,
sold, offered for sale or held for sale within this state,
or which is delivered for transportation or transported in
intrastate commerce or between points within this state
through any point outside of this state, shall be registered
in the office of the director, and the registration shall be
renewed annually.
2. The registrant shall file with the director a
statement including:
(1) The name and address of the registrant and the
name and address of the person whose name will appear on the
label, if other than the registrant;
(2) The name of the pesticide;
(3) Classification of the pesticide; and
(4) A complete copy of the labeling accompanying the
pesticide and a statement of all claims to be made for it,
including directions for use.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1005 2
3. The registrant shall pay an annual fee of two
hundred dollars for each product registered in any calendar
year or part thereof. The fee shall be deposited in the
state treasury to the credit of the agriculture protection
fund created in section 261.200 to be used solely to
administer the pest and pesticide programs of the department
of agriculture. The director may deposit up to seven
percent of the fee in the pesticide education fund under
section 281.265. If the funding exceeds the reasonable
costs to administer the programs as set forth herein, the
department of agriculture shall reduce fees for all
registrants if the fees derived exceed the reasonable cost
of administering the pest and pesticide programs of the
department of agriculture. All such registrations shall
expire on December thirty-first of any one year, unless
sooner cancelled. A registration for a special local need
pursuant to subsection 6 of this section, which is
disapproved by the federal government, shall expire on the
effective date of the disapproval.
4. Any registration approved by the director and in
effect on the thirty-first day of December for which a
renewal application has been made and the proper fee paid
shall continue in full force and effect until such time as
the director notifies the applicant that the registration
has been renewed, or otherwise denied, in accord with the
provisions of subsection 9 of this section. Forms for
reregistration shall be mailed to registrants at least
ninety days prior to the expiration date.
5. If the renewal of a pesticide registration is not
filed prior to January first of any one year, an additional
fee of fifty dollars shall be assessed and added to the
original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the

SB 1005 3
registration renewal for that pesticide shall be issued;
provided, that, such additional fee shall not apply if the
applicant furnishes an affidavit certifying that he or she
did not distribute such unregistered pesticide during the
period of nonregistration. The payment of such additional
fee is not a bar to any prosecution for doing business
without proper registry. The fee shall be credited to the
agriculture protection fund created under section 261.200 to
be used solely to administer the pest and pesticide programs
of the department of agriculture. If the funding exceeds
the reasonable cost to administer the programs as set forth
herein, the department of agriculture shall reduce fees for
all registrants if the fees derived exceed the reasonable
cost of administering the pest and pesticide programs of the
department of agriculture.
6. Provided the state complies with requirements of
the federal government to register pesticides to meet
special local needs, the director shall require that
registrants comply with sections 281.210 to 281.310 and
pertinent federal laws and regulations. Where two or more
pesticides meet the requirements of this subsection, one
shall not be registered in preference to the other.
7. The director may require the submission of the
complete formula of any pesticide to approve or deny product
registration. If it appears to the director that the
composition and efficacy of the pesticide is such as to
warrant the proposed claims for it and if the pesticide and
its labeling and other material required to be submitted
comply with the requirements of sections 281.210 to 281.310,
he or she shall register the pesticide.
8. Provided the state is authorized to issue
experimental use permits, the director may:

SB 1005 4
(1) Issue an experimental use permit to any person
applying for an experimental use permit if he or she
determines that the applicant needs such permit in order to
accumulate information necessary to register a pesticide
under sections 281.210 to 281.310. An application for an
experimental use permit may be filed at the time of or
before or after an application for registration is filed;
(2) Prescribe terms, conditions, and period of time
for the experimental permit which shall be under the
supervision of the director;
(3) Revoke any experimental permit, at any time, if he
or she finds that its terms or conditions are being
violated, or that its terms and conditions are inadequate to
avoid unreasonable adverse effects on the environment.
9. If it does not appear to the director that the
pesticide is such as to warrant the proposed claims for it
or if the pesticide and its labeling and other material
required to be submitted do not comply with the provisions
100 of sections 281.210 to 281.310 or with federal laws, he or
101 she shall notify the registrant of the manner in which the
102 pesticide, labeling, or other material required to be
103 submitted fail to comply with sections 281.210 to 281.310 or
104 with federal laws so as to afford the registrant an
105 opportunity to make the necessary corrections. If, upon
106 receipt of such notice, the registrant insists that such
107 corrections are not necessary and requests in writing that
108 the pesticide be registered or, in the case of a pesticide
109 that is already registered, that it not be cancelled, the
110 director, within ninety days, shall hold a public hearing to
111 determine if the pesticide in question should be registered
112 or cancelled. If, after such hearing, it is determined that
113 the pesticide should not be registered or that its

SB 1005 5
114 registration should be cancelled, the director may refuse
115 registration or cancel an existing registration until the
116 required label changes are accomplished. If the pesticide
117 is shown to be in compliance with sections 281.210 to
118 281.310 and federal laws, the pesticide will be registered.
119 Any appeals resulting from administrative decisions by the
120 director will be taken in accordance with sections 536.100
121 to 536.140.
122 10. Any pesticide registered by the United States
123 Environmental Protection Agency under the Federal
124 Insecticide Fungicide and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA), a
125 pesticide label approved by the United States Environmental
126 Protection Agency, or consistent with the United States
127 Environmental Protection Agency carcinogenicity
128 classification of the pesticide under FIFRA, shall be
129 sufficient to satisfy any requirement for a warning label
130 regarding cancer under any other provision of current law.
131 Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to grant full
132 immunity from liability to pesticide manufacturers in the
133 state.
134 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of sections
135 281.210 to 281.310, registration is not required in the case
136 of a pesticide shipped from one plant or warehouse within
137 this state to another plant or warehouse within this state
138 when such plants are operated by the same persons.
139 [11.] 12. The director shall not make any lack of
140 essentiality a criterion for denying registration of a
141 pesticide except where none of the labeled uses are present
142 in the state. Where two or more pesticides meet the
143 requirements of sections 281.210 to 281.310, one shall not
144 be registered in preference to the other.

SB 1005 6
145 [12.] 13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
146 to the contrary, the director may allow a reasonable period
147 of time for the retailer to dispose of existing stocks of
148 pesticides after the manufacturer or distributor has ceased
149 to register the product with the state. The method of
150 disposal shall be determined by the director.
✓